Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.340

Powers relating to capital stock or bonds of other corporations or associations.

An association may purchase or otherwise acquire, hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, sell, transfer, pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association engaged in any related activity or in the warehousing or handling or marketing or packing or manufacturing or processing or preparing for market of any of the fishery products handled by the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 34.]